Washington statutes.
RCW 18.79.340

Nursing technicians.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

(1) "Nursing technician" means a nursing student employed in a hospital licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW, a clinic, or a nursing home licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW, who:

(a) Is currently enrolled in good standing in a nursing program approved by the *commission and has not graduated; or

(b) Is a graduate of a nursing program approved by the *commission who graduated:

(i) Within the past thirty days; or

(ii) Within the past sixty days and has received a determination from the secretary that there is good cause to continue the registration period, as defined by the secretary in rule.

(2) No person may practice or represent oneself as a nursing technician by use of any title or description of services without being registered under this chapter, unless otherwise exempted by this chapter.

(3) The *commission may adopt rules to implement chapter 258, Laws of 2003.

[2012 c 153 s 13; 2003 c 258 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The reference to "nursing care quality assurance commission" was changed to "board of nursing" by 2023 c 123.

Rules—2012 c 153: See note following RCW 18.360.005.

Severability—Effective date—2003 c 258: See notes following RCW 18.79.330.